New York, session 2025-2026, S8722.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The real property law is amended by adding a new article 17 2 to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 17 4 PROHIBITING THE SALE OF REAL PROPERTY TO FOREIGN COUNTRIES OF CONCERN 5 Section 530. Definitions. 6 531. Sale of real property to foreign countries of concern 7 prohibited. 8 § 530. Definitions. As used in this article the following terms shall 9 have the following meanings: 10 1. "Agricultural and forest property" means all real property used for 11 raising, harvesting, and selling crops or for the feeding, breeding, 12 management, raising, sale of, or the production of livestock, or for the 13 growing and sale of timber and forest products. 14 2. "Critical infrastructure facility" means any of the following: 15 (a) A chemical manufacturing facility. 16 (b) A refinery. 17 (c) A plant or facility producing electric energy no matter how gener- 18 ated or produced. 19 (d) A water treatment facility or wastewater treatment plant. 20 (e) A liquid natural gas terminal. 21 (f) A telecommunications central switching office. 22 (g) A gas processing plant, including any plant used in the process- 23 ing, treatment, or fractionation of natural gas. 24 (h) A seaport facility. 25 (i) Aerospace or spaceport infrastructure. 26 (j) An airport. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14334-01-6 S. 8722 2 1 3. "Foreign country of concern" means China, Iran, North Korea, and 2 Russia. This term shall not include Taiwan. 3 4. "Foreign principal" means any of the following: 4 (a) The government or any official of the government of a foreign 5 country of concern. 6 (b) A political party or member of a political party or any subdivi- 7 sion of a political party in a foreign country of concern. 8 (c) A country or government identified on any sanctions list of the 9 United States Department of the Treasury's Office of Foreign Assets 10 Control. 11 5. "Military installation" means a base, camp, post, station, yard, or 12 center that is under the jurisdiction of the United States Department of 13 Defense or its affiliates, encompassing at least ten contiguous acres. 14 6. "Real property" means land, buildings, fixtures, and all other 15 improvements to land. 16 § 531. Sale of real property to foreign countries of concern prohibit- 17 ed. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it shall be unlawful 18 for any person or entity to lease, sell, offer to sell, convey or trans- 19 fer to any foreign country of concern or foreign principal any interest 20 in the following property located within the state: 21 (a) agricultural and forest property; and 22 (b) real property on or within ten miles of any military installation 23 or critical infrastructure facility. 24 2. No title insurer, title agent, real estate licensee, or other 25 settlement provider as defined by the Real Estate Procedures Act, 12 26 U.S.C. 2601 et seq., shall be liable for any violation of this article. 27 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the attorney general 28 shall have the authority to enforce the provisions of this article by 29 applying, in the name of the people of the state of New York, to the 30 supreme court of the state of New York for an order enjoining the 31 continuance of such violative activity, including but not limited to 32 bringing an action for injunctive or declaratory relief if any real 33 property is in the process of being or has been sold or leased in 34 violation of this article. 35 4. The provisions of this section shall only apply to property 36 acquired after the effective date of this section. 37 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 38 have become a law.